Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Cruelty to Animals

§ 351.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Animal” means all living sentient creatures, not human beings.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Horse” means the entire family of Equidae.

“Humane officer” or “officer” means:

any enforcement officer as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(11)(A) or investigator employed by the Office of the Attorney General or State’s Attorney; or

an individual who has received the training required by section 356 of this title who is:

a designated humane society employee; or

an animal control officer appointed by the legislative body of a municipality who is authorized by the legislative body to perform the duties and functions of a humane officer.

“Humane society” or “society for prevention of cruelty to animals” means a private, nonprofit animal care facility registered and in good standing with the Vermont Secretary of State.

“Local board of health” means the town or city health officer and the selectboard members or aldermen.

“Necessary medical attention” shall include medical or surgical treatment for injury, disease, excessive parasitism, dehydration, malnutrition, pain, or impaired locomotive function.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, or corporation, or authorized agent or representative of a person, partnership, or corporation.

“Sanitation” means the maintenance of clean conditions for indoor and outdoor enclosures to minimize health hazards, including periodic cleanings to remove excretions or other waste materials, dirt, and trash.

“Torture” or “torment” means omission, neglect, or an act by an animal owner or other person, whereby physical pain, suffering, or death is caused or permitted to be caused to an animal.

“Livestock” means cattle, bison, horses, sheep, goats, swine, Cervidae, ratites, and camelids.

“Poultry” means meat and egg producing chickens, exhibition (fancy) chickens, turkeys, domestic ducks, geese, pheasants, chicken partridge, and cotarnix quail.

“Livestock and poultry husbandry practices” means the raising, management and using of animals to provide humans with food, fiber, or transportation in a manner consistent with:

husbandry practices recommended for the species by fully accredited agricultural colleges and the U.S. Department of Agriculture Extension Service;

husbandry practices modified for the species to conform to the Vermont environment and terrain; and

husbandry practices that minimize pain and suffering.

“Agricultural or sporting association” means an organization or association determined by the Secretary.

“Living space” means any cage, crate, or other structure used to confine an animal that serves as its principal, primary housing and that provides protection from the elements. Living space does not include a structure, such as a doghouse, in which an animal is not confined, or a cage, crate, or other structure in which the animal is temporarily confined.

“Adequate food” means food that is not spoiled or contaminated and is of sufficient nutritional content to meet the normal daily requirements for the condition and size of the animal and the environment in which it is kept. An animal shall be fed or have food available at least once each day, unless a licensed veterinarian instructs otherwise or withholding food is in accordance with accepted veterinary practices or livestock and poultry husbandry practices.

“Adequate water” means potable water that is either accessible to the animal at all times or is provided at suitable intervals for the species and in sufficient quantity for the health of the animal. In no event shall the interval when water is not provided exceed 24 hours. Snow or ice is not an adequate water source unless provided in accordance with livestock and poultry husbandry practices.

[Repealed.]

“Enclosure” means any structure, fence, device, or other barrier used to restrict an animal or animals to a limited amount of space.

“Livestock guardian dog” means a purpose-bred dog that is:

specifically trained to live with livestock without causing them harm while repelling predators;

being used to live with and guard livestock; and

acclimated to local weather conditions.

“Sexual conduct” means:

any act between a person and animal that involves contact between the mouth, sex organ, or anus of a person and the mouth, sex organ, or anus of an animal; or

without a bona fide veterinary or animal husbandry purpose, the insertion, however slight, of any part of a person’s body or of any instrument, apparatus, or other object into the vaginal or anal opening of an animal.

“Adequate constructed shelter” means a well-drained and structurally sound building with a waterproof roof that is of sufficient size to provide a windbreak and protection from exposure to prevailing winds, rain, hail, sleet, snow, and sun and that provides enough space to accommodate at one time all livestock and animals comfortably. The building opening size and height shall, at a minimum, allow six inches of clearance above the largest animal’s ears when the animal is standing in a normal position, and the clearance shall be maintained at that level even with manure and litter buildup.

“Adequate natural shelter” means a natural structure or formation, which may include a stand of trees that:

is a well-drained area of sufficient size to provide a windbreak and protection from exposure to prevailing winds, rain, hail, sleet, sun, and snow; and

provides enough space to accommodate at one time all livestock or animals maintained out-of-doors in the area.

“Adequate ventilation” means that ventilation in an enclosed or confined area shall be sufficient to control excessive ambient temperatures and humidity and to prevent the accumulation of toxic gases, such as ammonia.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2009, No. 121 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2013, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 72; 2013, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2017, No. 58, § 1; 2017, No. 62, § 10; 2019, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2021, No. 38, § 1.

§ 351a.
Purpose of subchapter.

The purpose of this subchapter is to prevent cruelty to animals. In implementing this subchapter, enforcement officers are encouraged to educate the public on requirements of the subchapter and, when appropriate, to seek voluntary resolution of violations.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 351b.
Scope of subchapter.

This subchapter shall not apply to:

activities regulated by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to 10 V.S.A. Part 4, including the act of destroying feral swine in accordance with 10 V.S.A. § 4709(f);

scientific research governed by accepted procedural standards subject to review by an institutional animal care and use committee;

livestock and poultry husbandry practices for raising, management, and use of animals;

veterinary medical or surgical procedures; and

the killing of an animal as provided by 20 V.S.A. §§ 3809 and 3545.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended 2019, No. 129 (Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 352.
Cruelty to animals.

A person commits the crime of cruelty to animals if the person:

Intentionally kills or attempts to kill any animal belonging to another person without first obtaining legal authority or consent of the owner.

Overworks, overloads, tortures, torments, abandons, administers poison to, cruelly harms or mutilates an animal or exposes a poison with intent that it be taken by an animal.

Ties, tethers, or restrains an animal, either a pet or livestock, in a manner that is inhumane or is detrimental to its welfare. Livestock and poultry husbandry practices are exempted.

Deprives an animal that a person owns, possesses, or acts as an agent for of adequate food, water, shelter, rest, sanitation, or necessary medical attention or transports an animal in overcrowded vehicles.

Owns, possesses, keeps, or trains an animal engaged in an exhibition of fighting; possesses, keeps, or trains any animal with intent that it be engaged in an exhibition of fighting; or permits any such act to be done on premises under his or her charge or control.
(5) (A) Owns, possesses, keeps, or trains an animal engaged in an exhibition of fighting; possesses, keeps, or trains any animal with intent that it be engaged in an exhibition of fighting; or permits any such act to be done on premises under his or her charge or control.

Owns, possesses, ships, transports, delivers, or keeps a device, equipment, or implement for the purpose of training or conditioning an animal for participation in animal fighting or enhancing an animal’s fighting capability.

Acts as judge or spectator at events of animal fighting or bets or wagers on the outcome of such fight.

As poundkeeper, officer, or agent of a humane society or as an owner or employee of an establishment for treatment, board, or care of an animal, knowingly receives, sells, transfers, or otherwise conveys an animal in his or her care for the purpose of research or vivisection.

Intentionally torments or harasses an animal owned or engaged by a police department or public agency of the State or its political subdivisions or interferes with the lawful performance of a police animal.

Knowingly sells, offers for sale, barters, or displays living baby chicks, ducklings, or other fowl that have been dyed, colored, or otherwise treated so as to impart to them an artificial color or fails to provide poultry with proper brooder facilities.

Uses a live animal as bait or lure in a race, game, or contest or in training animals in a manner inconsistent with 10 V.S.A. Part 4 or the rules adopted thereunder.

Engages in sexual conduct with an animal.
(11) (A) Engages in sexual conduct with an animal.

Possesses, sells, transfers, purchases, or otherwise obtains an animal with the intent that it be used for sexual conduct.

Organizes, promotes, conducts, aids, abets, or participates in as an observer an act involving any sexual conduct with an animal.

Causes, aids, or abets another person to engage in sexual conduct with an animal.

Permits sexual conduct with an animal to be conducted on premises under his or her charge or control.

Advertises, offers, or accepts the offer of an animal with the intent that it be subject to sexual conduct in this State.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 7; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2015, No. 53, § 1; 2017, No. 62, § 10; 2017, No. 112 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 2018.

§ 352a.
Aggravated cruelty to animals.

A person commits the crime of aggravated cruelty to animals if the person:

kills an animal by intentionally causing the animal undue pain or suffering;

intentionally, maliciously, and without just cause tortures, mutilates, or cruelly beats an animal; or

intentionally injures or kills an animal that is in the performance of official duties while under the supervision of a law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 3; 2015, No. 118 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 352b.
Rules; affirmative defense.

An enforcement officer implementing the provisions of section 352 or 352a of this title shall be guided by rules established by the Secretary.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an affirmative defense to prosecution under section 352 or 352a of this title may be raised when:

except for vivisection or research under subdivision 352(7) of this title, the defendant was a veterinarian whose conduct conformed to accepted veterinary practice for the area, or was a scientist whose conduct was a part of scientific research governed by accepted procedural standards subject to review by an institutional care and use committee;

the defendant’s conduct was designed to control or eliminate rodents, ants, or other common pests on the defendant’s own property;

the defendant was a person appropriately licensed to utilize pesticides under 6 V.S.A. chapter 87;

the defendant humanely euthanized any animal as a representative of a duly organized humane society, animal shelter, or town pound according to rules of this subchapter, or as a veterinarian destroying animals under 20 V.S.A. chapter 193 or 20 V.S.A. §§ 3511 and 3513; or

a State agency was implementing a rabies control program.

An affirmative defense to a charge of abandonment under section 352 of this title shall not be recognized where a person abandons an animal at or near an animal shelter or veterinary clinic, farm, or other place of shelter, without making reasonable arrangements for the care of the animal.

The authority to enforce this chapter shall not be construed in a manner inconsistent with the animal control or disease control eradication programs in Title 6, or 20 V.S.A. chapters 191, 193, 194, and 195 or the provisions of 10 V.S.A. Part 4, or the rules adopted thereunder.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 353.
Degree of offense; sentencing upon conviction.

Penalties.

Except as provided in subdivision (3), (4), or (5) of this subsection, cruelty to animals under section 352 of this title shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than one year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent convictions shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than two years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.

Aggravated cruelty under section 352a of this title shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than five years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent offenses shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than ten years or a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.

An offense committed under subdivision 352(5) or (6) of this title shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than five years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.

Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (4), a person found in violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title pursuant to this subdivision shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent convictions shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than two years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(4) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (4), a person found in violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title pursuant to this subdivision shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent convictions shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than two years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.

In lieu of a criminal citation or arrest, a law enforcement officer may issue a civil citation to a person who violates subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title if the person has not been previously adjudicated in violation of this chapter. A person adjudicated in violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title pursuant to this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $500.00. At any time prior to the person admitting the violation and paying the assessed penalty, the State’s Attorney may withdraw the complaint filed with the Judicial Bureau and file an information charging a violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.

Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require that a civil citation be issued prior to a criminal charge of violating subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title.

A person who violates subdivision 352(1) of this title by intentionally killing or attempting to kill an animal belonging to another or subdivision 352(2) of this title by torturing, administering poison to, or cruelly harming or mutilating an animal shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

In addition to any other sentence the court may impose, the court may require a defendant convicted of a violation under section 352 or 352a of this title to:

Forfeit any rights to the animal subjected to cruelty, and to any other animal, except livestock or poultry owned, possessed, or in the custody of the defendant.

Repay the reasonable costs incurred by any person, municipality or agency for providing care for the animal prior to judgment. If the court does not order a defendant to pay all the applicable costs incurred or orders only partial payment, it shall state on the record the reasons for that action.

Forfeit any future right to own, possess, or care for any animal for a period that the court deems appropriate.

Participate in available animal cruelty prevention programs or educational programs, or both, or obtain psychiatric or psychological counseling, within a reasonable distance from the defendant’s residence. If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent under section 352 or 352a of this title, the court may order the juvenile to undergo a psychiatric or psychological evaluation and to participate in treatment that the court determines to be appropriate after due consideration of the evaluation. The court may impose the costs of such programs or counseling upon the defendant when appropriate.

Permit periodic unannounced visits for a period up to one year by a humane officer to inspect the care and condition of any animal permitted by the court to remain in the care, custody, or possession of the defendant. Such period may be extended by the court upon motion made by the State.

Upon an order of forfeiture of an animal under this section or section 354 of this title, the court shall order custody of the animal remanded to a humane society or other individual deemed appropriate by the court, for further disposition in accordance with accepted practices for humane treatment of animals. A transfer of rights under this section constitutes a transfer of ownership and shall not constitute or authorize any limitation upon the right of the humane society, individual, or other entity, to whom rights are granted to dispose of the animal.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 10; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 4; 2007, No. 51, § 20; 2009, No. 154, § 238; 2013, No. 67, § 12; 2017, No. 62, § 10; 2017, No. 112 (Adj. Sess.), § 1a, eff. May 1, 2018.

§ 354.
Enforcement; possession of abused animal; searches and seizures; forfeiture.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall be consulted prior to any enforcement action brought pursuant to this chapter that involves livestock and poultry. Law enforcement may consult with the Secretary in person or by electronic means, and the Secretary shall assist law enforcement in determining whether the practice or animal condition, or both, represent acceptable livestock or poultry husbandry practices.

Any humane officer as defined in section 351 of this title may enforce this chapter. As part of an enforcement action, a humane officer may seize an animal being cruelly treated in violation of this chapter.

Voluntary surrender. A humane officer may accept animals voluntarily surrendered by the owner anytime during the cruelty investigation. The humane officer shall have a surrendered animal examined and assessed within 72 hours by a veterinarian licensed to practice in the State of Vermont.

Search and seizure using a search warrant. A humane officer having probable cause to believe an animal is being subjected to cruel treatment in violation of this subchapter may apply for a search warrant pursuant to the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure to authorize the officer to enter the premises where the animal is kept and seize the animal. The application and affidavit for the search warrant shall be reviewed and authorized by an attorney for the State when sought by an officer other than an enforcement officer defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(11). A veterinarian licensed to practice in Vermont must accompany the humane officer during the execution of the search warrant.

Seizure without a search warrant. If the humane officer witnesses a situation in which the humane officer determines that an animal’s life is in jeopardy and immediate action is required to protect the animal’s health or safety, the officer may seize the animal without a warrant. The humane officer shall immediately take an animal seized under this subdivision to a licensed veterinarian for medical attention to stabilize the animal’s condition and to assess the health of the animal.

A humane officer shall provide suitable care at a reasonable cost for an animal seized under this section, and have a lien on the animal for all expenses incurred. A humane officer may arrange for the euthanasia of a severely injured, diseased, or suffering animal upon the recommendation of a licensed veterinarian. A humane officer may arrange for euthanasia of an animal seized under this section when the owner is unwilling or unable to provide necessary medical attention required while the animal is in custodial care or when the animal cannot be safely confined under standard housing conditions. An animal not destroyed by euthanasia shall be kept in custodial care and provided with necessary medical care until final disposition of the criminal charges except as provided in subsections (d) through (h) of this section. The custodial caregiver shall be responsible for maintaining the records applicable to all animals seized, including identification, residence, location, medical treatment, and disposition of the animals.

If an animal is seized under this section, the State may institute a civil proceeding for forfeiture of the animal in the territorial unit of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court where the offense is alleged to have occurred. The proceeding shall be instituted by a motion for forfeiture if a criminal charge has been filed or a petition for forfeiture if no criminal charge has been filed, which shall be filed with the court and served upon the animal’s owner. The civil forfeiture proceeding is intended to run independently from any criminal prosecution and shall not be delayed pending disposition of any criminal proceeding.

A preliminary hearing shall be held within 21 days of institution of the civil forfeiture proceeding. If the defendant requests a hearing on the merits, the court shall schedule a final hearing on the merits to be held within 21 days of the date of the preliminary hearing. Time limits under this subsection shall not be construed as jurisdictional.
(e) (1) A preliminary hearing shall be held within 21 days of institution of the civil forfeiture proceeding. If the defendant requests a hearing on the merits, the court shall schedule a final hearing on the merits to be held within 21 days of the date of the preliminary hearing. Time limits under this subsection shall not be construed as jurisdictional.

If the defendant fails to respond to the notice for preliminary hearing, the court shall enter a default judgment ordering the immediate forfeiture of the animal in accordance with the provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title. A motion to reopen a default judgment shall be filed in writing with the court no later than 30 days after entry of a default judgment. A default judgment shall not be reopened unless good cause is shown.

At the hearing on the motion for forfeiture, the State shall have the burden of establishing by clear and convincing evidence that the animal was subjected to cruelty, neglect, or abandonment in violation of section 352 or 352a of this title. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order. If the State meets its burden of proof, the court shall order the immediate forfeiture of the animal in accordance with the provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title.
(f) (1) At the hearing on the motion for forfeiture, the State shall have the burden of establishing by clear and convincing evidence that the animal was subjected to cruelty, neglect, or abandonment in violation of section 352 or 352a of this title. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order. If the State meets its burden of proof, the court shall order the immediate forfeiture of the animal in accordance with the provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title.

Affidavits of law enforcement officers, humane officers, animal control officers, veterinarians, or expert witnesses of either party shall be admissible evidence that may be rebutted by witnesses called by either party. The affidavits shall be delivered to the other party at least five business days prior to the hearing. Upon request of the other party or the court, the party offering an affidavit shall make the affiant available by telephone at the hearing. The court may allow any witness to testify by telephone in lieu of a personal appearance and shall adopt rules with respect to such testimony.

No testimony or other information presented by the defendant in connection with a forfeiture proceeding under this section or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information may be used for any purpose, including impeachment and cross-examination, against the defendant in any criminal case, except a prosecution for perjury or giving a false statement.

If the defendant is convicted of criminal charges under this chapter or if an order of forfeiture is entered against an owner under this section, the defendant or owner shall be required to repay all reasonable costs incurred by the custodial caregiver for caring for the animal, including veterinary expenses. The Restitution Unit within the Center for Crime Victim Services is authorized to collect the funds owed by the defendant or owner on behalf of the custodial caregiver or a governmental agency that has contracted or paid for custodial care in the same manner as restitution is collected pursuant to section 7043 of this title. The restitution order shall include the information required under subdivision 7043(e)(2)(A) of this title. The court shall make findings with respect to the total amount of all costs incurred by the custodial caregiver.
(g) (1) If the defendant is convicted of criminal charges under this chapter or if an order of forfeiture is entered against an owner under this section, the defendant or owner shall be required to repay all reasonable costs incurred by the custodial caregiver for caring for the animal, including veterinary expenses. The Restitution Unit within the Center for Crime Victim Services is authorized to collect the funds owed by the defendant or owner on behalf of the custodial caregiver or a governmental agency that has contracted or paid for custodial care in the same manner as restitution is collected pursuant to section 7043 of this title. The restitution order shall include the information required under subdivision 7043(e)(2)(A) of this title. The court shall make findings with respect to the total amount of all costs incurred by the custodial caregiver.

If the defendant is acquitted of criminal charges under this chapter and a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section is not pending, an animal that has been taken into custodial care shall be returned to the defendant unless the State institutes a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section within seven business days of the acquittal.
(2) (A) If the defendant is acquitted of criminal charges under this chapter and a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section is not pending, an animal that has been taken into custodial care shall be returned to the defendant unless the State institutes a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section within seven business days of the acquittal.

If the court rules in favor of the owner in a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section and criminal charges against the owner under this chapter are not pending, an animal that has been taken into custodial care shall be returned to the owner unless the State files criminal charges under this section within seven business days after the entry of final judgment.

If an animal is returned to a defendant or owner under this subdivision, the defendant or owner shall not be responsible for the costs of caring for the animal.

A forfeiture order issued under this section may be appealed as a matter of right to the Supreme Court. The order shall not be stayed pending appeal.

The provisions of this section are in addition to and not in lieu of the provisions of section 353 of this title.

It is unlawful for a person to interfere with a humane officer or the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets engaged in official duties under this chapter. A person who violates this subsection shall be prosecuted under section 3001 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1989, No. 270 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 1997, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 11; 2003, No. 42, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003; 2003, No. 120 (Adj. Sess.), § 5; 2009, No. 154, § 238; 2013, No. 201 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2015, No. 155 (Adj. Sess.), § 7; 2017, No. 11, § 24.

§ 355.
Interference with or cruelty to a guide dog.

As used in this section:

“Custody” means the care, control, and maintenance of a dog.

“Guide dog” means a dog, whose status is reasonably identifiable, individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability for purposes of guiding an individual with impaired vision, alerting an individual with impaired hearing to the presence of people or sounds, assisting an individual during a seizure, pulling a wheelchair, retrieving items, providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability, and assisting with navigation.

“Notice” means:

a verbal or otherwise communicated warning regarding the behavior of another person and a request that the person stop the behavior; and

a written confirmation submitted to the local law enforcement agency, either by the owner of the guide dog or another person on his or her behalf, which shall include a statement that the warning and request was given and the person’s telephone number.

No person shall recklessly injure or cause the death of a guide dog, or recklessly permit a dog he or she owns or has custody of to injure or cause the death of a guide dog. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or both.

No person who has received notice or has knowledge that his or her behavior, or the behavior of a dog he or she owns or has custody of, is interfering with the use of a guide dog shall recklessly continue to interfere with the use of a guide dog, or recklessly allow the dog he or she owns or has custody of to continue to interfere with the use of a guide dog, by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the guide dog user or his or her guide dog. A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

No person shall recklessly interfere with the use of a guide dog, or recklessly permit a dog he or she owns or has custody of to interfere with a guide dog, by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the guide dog user or his or her guide dog. A person who violates this subsection commits a civil offense and shall be:

for a first offense, fined not more than $100.00;

for a second or subsequent offense, fined not more than $250.00.

A violation of subsection (d) of this section shall constitute notice as defined in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

As provided in section 7043 of this title, restitution shall be considered by the court in any sentencing under this section if the victim has suffered any material loss. Material loss for purposes of this section means uninsured:

veterinary medical expenses;

costs of temporary replacement assistance services, whether provided by a person or guide dog;

replacement value of an equally trained guide dog without any differentiation for the age or experience of the dog;

loss of wages; and

costs and expenses incurred by the person as a result of the injury to the guide dog.

HISTORY:

Added 2009, No. 121 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 356.
Humane officer required training; authorization to perform duties.

All humane officers as defined in subdivision 351(4)(B) of this title shall complete the animal cruelty response training as required by 20 V.S.A. § 2365b in order to serve in the capacity of a humane officer.

A humane officer as defined in subdivision 351(4)(B) of this title shall be authorized to serve as a humane officer if the humane officer is employed by a humane society or a municipality and has completed the trainings as required by this section and by 20 V.S.A. § 2365b. Upon termination of employment from the humane society or municipality through which they were authorized to serve, the person shall no longer be authorized to perform the legal functions of a humane officer.

The Animal Cruelty Investigation Advisory Board shall keep and at least annually update an index of individuals who have completed the animal cruelty response training as required by this section and by 20 V.S.A. § 2365b.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 155 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2017; amended 2021, No. 38, § 2.